Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1282.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Flood Hazard Notification Act.Section 2. Notification to affected property owners.(a) Duty of municipal corporation.--A municipal corporation, within 90 45 days of receipt of notification from the Federal Emergency Management Agency that indicates a change in a preliminary special flood hazard area map relating to real property used for residential, commercial, mixed-use, industrial, special purpose or agricultural purposes within the municipal corporation, shall provide to each owner of the <--12345678910111213141516 property:(1) written notification that the change has occurred within the municipal corporation;(2) written notification of the name and contact information of the appointed floodplain administrator for the municipal corporation; and(3) written notification of the Internet website, address and telephone number for the National Flood Insurance Program to aid the property owner in determining if there has been a change to the flood risk of the property.; AND(4) WRITTEN NOTIFICATION OF THE 90-DAY APPEAL AND COMMENT PERIODS PROVIDED UNDER 44 CFR PT. 67 (RELATING TO APPEALS FROM PROPOSED FLOOD ELEVATION DETERMINATIONS), AS WELL AS THE DATE ON WHICH THE APPEAL AND COMMENT PERIODS WILL TERMINATE.(b) Duty of county.--A county shall, within 90 45 days of being informed by the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency of a change in a final special flood hazard area map of the Federal Emergency Management Agency relating to real property used for residential, commercial, mixed-use, industrial, special purpose or agricultural purposes within the county, provide to each owner of the property written notification that the change has occurred. AND THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURE:PLEASE READ: IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON FLOOD INSURANCE. MANY PROPERTIES IN PENNSYLVANIA ARE EXPERIENCING INCREASED FLOOD RISKS. YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO VISIT THE PENNSYLVANIA INSURANCE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE TO REVIEW THESE RISKS. A STANDARD HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY TYPICALLY DOES NOT COVER DAMAGE CAUSED BY FLOODING. YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO SPEAK 20250HB1282PN1715 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WITH AN INSURANCE PROFESSIONAL ABOUT EXAMINING YOUR HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY TO DETERMINE WHETHER YOU ARE COVERED FOR DAMAGE CAUSED BY FLOODING. IF YOU ARE NOT COVERED, COVERAGE MAY BE AVAILABLE FROM AN INSURANCE COMPANY OR THROUGH THE NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM.(C) STANDARDIZED NOTIFICATION.--THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE A STANDARDIZED TEMPLATE NOTIFICATION FORM THAT MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS MAY UTILIZE AT THEIR DISCRETION IN PROVIDING NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(c) (D) Form of notice.--Notice sent by first class mail to the last known address of the owner as shown on the current real estate tax assessment record shall be deemed adequate compliance with the duty to provide notification under subsections (a) and (b).(d) Municipal immunity.--A municipal corporation or county may(E) MUNICIPAL IMMUNITY.--(1) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OR COUNTY SHALL not be liable for the failure of a property owner to receive or act on written notification under subsection (a) or (b) as a result of a disruption of service or the failure to deliver the notification on the part of the United States Postal Service.(2) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OR COUNTY SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR THE FAILURE OF A PROPERTY OWNER TO ACT ON WRITTEN NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B).Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1282PN1715 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829